Hawaii statutes.
[§245-30] Penalty for failure to make
timely payment. A licensee who fails to pay any amount owing for the
purchase of stamps within the time required shall pay a penalty of:

(1) Ten per cent of the amount due in addition to the
amount due; and

(2) Interest at the rate specified in section 231-39
from the date on which the amount became due and payable until the date of
payment. [L 2000, c 249, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next